Utah statutes.
53B-2a-106.   College campuses -- Duties.
(1)  Each Utah College of Applied Technology college campus shall, within the
geographic area served by the college campus:
(a)  offer a non-credit post-secondary and secondary career and technical
education curriculum;
(b)  offer that curriculum at:
(i)  low cost to adult students, as approved by the board of trustees; and
(ii)  no tuition to secondary students;
(c)  provide career and technical education that will result in:
(i)  appropriate licensing, certification, or other evidence of completion of
training; and
(ii)  qualification for specific employment, with an emphasis on high demand,
high wage, and high skill jobs in business and industry;
(d)  develop cooperative agreements with school districts, charter schools,
other higher education institutions, businesses, industries, and community and
private agencies to maximize the availability of instructional facilities
within the geographic area served by the college campus; and
(e)  after consulting with school districts and charter schools within the
geographic area served by the college campus:
(i)  ensure that secondary students in the public education system have access
to career and technical education at each college campus; and
(ii)  prepare and submit an annual report to the Utah College of Applied
Technology detailing:
(A)  how the career and technical education needs of secondary students within
the region are being met;
(B)  what access secondary students within the region have to programs offered
at college campuses;
(C)  how the emphasis on high demand, high wage, high skill jobs in business
and industry described in Subsection (1)(c)(ii) is being provided; and
(D)  student tuition and fees.
(2)  A college campus may offer:
(a)  a competency-based high school diploma approved by the State Board of
Education in accordance with Section 53A-1-402;
(b)  non-credit, basic instruction in areas such as reading, language arts,
and mathematics that are necessary for student success in a chosen career and
technical education or job-related program; and
(c)  non-credit courses of interest when similar offerings to the community
are limited and courses are financially self-supporting.
(3)  A college campus may not:
(a)  offer courses other than non-credit career and technical education or the
non-credit, basic instruction described in Subsections (2)(b) and (c);
(b)  offer a degree;
(c)  offer career and technical education or basic instruction outside the
geographic area served by the college campus without a cooperative agreement
between an affected institution, except as provided in Subsection (6);
(d)  provide tenure or academic rank for its instructors; and
(e)  participate in intercollegiate athletics.
(4)  The mission of a college campus is limited to non-credit career and
technical education and may not expand to include credit-based academic
programs typically offered by community colleges or other institutions of
higher education.
(5)  A campus shall be recognized as a college campus of the Utah College of
Applied Technology, and regional affiliation shall be retained and recognized
through local designations such as "Bridgerland Applied Technology College: A
Utah College of Applied Technology Campus."
(6) (a)  A college campus may offer career and technical education or basic
instruction outside the geographic area served by the college campus without a
cooperative agreement, as required in Subsection (3)(c), if:
(i)  the career and technical education or basic instruction is specifically
requested by:
(A)  an employer; or
(B)  a craft, trade, or apprenticeship program;
(ii)  the college campus notifies the affected institution about the request;
and
(iii)  the affected institution is given an opportunity to make a proposal,
prior to any contract being finalized or training being initiated by the
college campus, to the employer, craft, trade, or apprenticeship program about
offering the requested career and technical education or basic instruction,
provided that the proposal shall be presented no later than one business week
from the delivery of the notice described under Subsection (6)(b).
(b)  The requirements under Subsection (6)(a)(iii) do not apply if there is a
prior training relationship.
